Nebraska, session 109, LB344.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB344 LB344
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 46-740, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
46-740 (1) If allocation is adopted for use of ground water for
irrigation purposes in a management area, the permissible withdrawal of
ground water shall be allocated equally per irrigated acre except as
permitted by subsections (4) through (6) of section 46-739. Such
allocation shall specify the total number of acre-inches that are
allocated per irrigated acre per year, except that the district may allow
a ground water user to average his or her allocation over any reasonable
period of time. A ground water user may use his or her allocation on all
or any part of the irrigated acres to which the allocation applies or in
any other manner approved by the district.
(2) Except as permitted pursuant to subsections (4) through (6) of
section 46-739, if annual rotation or reduction of irrigated acres is
adopted for use of ground water for irrigation purposes in a management
area, the nonuse of irrigated acres shall be a uniform percentage
reduction of each landowner's irrigated acres within the management area
or a subarea of the management area. Such uniform reduction may be
adjusted for each landowner based upon crops grown on his or her land to
reflect the varying consumptive requirements between crops.
(3)(a) If allocations to any municipality have been made prior to
November 1, 2005, such allocations shall remain in full force and effect,
but may be amended by the appropriate natural resources district. (3)
Unless allocations have been made an integrated management plan, a rule,
or an order is established, adopted, or issued prior to November 1, 2005,
no integrated management plan, rule, or order shall limit the use of
ground water by a municipality, within an area determined by the
Department of Natural Resources to be fully appropriated pursuant to
section 46-714 or designated as overappropriated pursuant to section
46-713, until January 1, 2026, except that on and after January 1, 2026,
any new or expanded commercial or industrial user served by a municipal
-2-

LB344 LB344
2025 2025
water source that commences water use at a rate in excess of twenty-five
million gallons annually, expands water use to a rate in excess of
twenty-five million gallons annually, or at any time exceeds water use of
twenty-five million gallons annually shall be subject to the controls of
an integrated management plan, rule, or order and provide a mitigation
report to the natural resources district within which such user is
located. The mitigation report shall include (i) annual water use, (ii)
annual volume of water returned to the municipal system or discharged to
another location, (iii) source of water used to mitigate the new or
expanded consumptive use, and (iv) any other information deemed necessary
by the applicable natural resources district or the Department of Natural
Resources. The mitigation report shall be approved by the applicable
natural resources district and the Department of Natural Resources prior
to January 1, 2026, or prior to commencement of the new or expanded
use. :
(b) Each integrated management plan, rule, or order within an area
determined by the Department of Natural Resources to be fully
appropriated pursuant to section 46-714 or designated as overappropriated
pursuant to section 46-713 may require annual water use and water
consumption reporting from municipalities.
(a) Any allocations to a municipality that have been made as of
November 1, 2005, shall remain in full force and effect unless changed by
the appropriate natural resources district;
(b)(i) For any municipality that has not received an allocation as
of November 1, 2005, the minimum annual allocation may be the greater of
either the amount of ground water authorized by a permit issued pursuant
to the Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water Transfers Permit Act or
the governmental, commercial, and industrial uses of the municipality
plus a per capita allowance. Water for commercial and industrial uses may
be limited as specified in subdivision (b)(iii) of this subsection.
(ii) The per capita allowance shall be based on the location of the
-3-

LB344 LB344
2025 2025
municipality, increasing in equal increments from east to west, and shall
not be less than two hundred gallons per person per day at 95 degrees, 19
minutes, 00 seconds longitude and not less than two hundred fifty gallons
per person per day at 104 degrees, 04 minutes, 00 seconds longitude.
Persons served by a municipality outside of its corporate limits shall be
considered part of the municipality's population if such service begins
prior to January 1, 2026.
(iii) Prior to January 1, 2026, any new or expanded single
commercial or single industrial development served by any municipality
within the fully appropriated or overappropriated area which, after July
14, 2006, commences water use resulting in the consumptive use of water
in amounts greater than twenty-five million gallons annually may be
subject to controls adopted pursuant to section 46-715;
(c) Prior to January 1, 2026, increases in the consumptive use of
water by a municipality that result in a decrease in streamflow shall be
addressed by the integrated management plan pursuant to controls or
incentive programs adopted pursuant to section 46-715 and shall not
affect the municipal allocations outlined in subdivisions (3)(a) and (b)
of this section. Any permanent reduction in consumptive use of water
associated with municipal growth, including governmental, industrial, and
commercial growth, during the period between July 14, 2006, and January
1, 2026, shall accrue to the benefit of the natural resources district
within which such municipality is located; and
(d) To qualify for the exemption specified in subsection (3) of this
section, any city of the metropolitan class, city of the primary class,
city of the first class, or city of the second class shall file a
conservation plan with the natural resources district, if required by the
integrated management plan. Villages and other municipalities smaller
than a city of the second class shall not be required to submit a
conservation plan to qualify for such exemption.
(4) On and after January 1, 2026, the base amount for an annual
-4-

LB344 LB344
2025 2025
allocation to a municipality shall be determined as the greater of either
(a) the amount of water authorized by a permit issued pursuant to the
Municipal and Rural Domestic Ground Water Transfers Permit Act or (b) the
greatest annual use prior to January 1, 2026, for uses specified in
subdivision (3)(b) of this section plus the per capita allowance
described in subdivision (3)(b)(ii) of this section. On and after January
1, 2026, increases in the consumptive use of water by a municipality that
result in a decrease in streamflow shall be addressed by the integrated
management plan pursuant to controls or incentive programs adopted
pursuant to section 46-715. Each municipality may be subject to controls
adopted pursuant to such section for amounts in excess of the
allocations.
(4) (5) Unless an integrated management plan, rule, or order is
established, adopted, or issued prior to November 1, 2005, no integrated
management plan, rule, or order shall limit the use of ground water by a
nonmunicipal commercial or industrial water user within an area
determined by the department to be fully appropriated pursuant to section
46-714 or designated as overappropriated pursuant to section 46-713,
until January 1, 2026, except that:
(a) Prior to January 1, 2026, the minimum annual allocation for a
nonmunicipal commercial or industrial user shall be the greater of either
(i) the amount specified in a permit issued pursuant to the Industrial
Ground Water Regulatory Act or (ii) the amount necessary to achieve the
commercial or industrial use, including all new or expanded uses that
consume less than twenty-five million gallons annually. Any increases in
the consumptive use of water by a nonmunicipal commercial or industrial
water user that result in a decrease in streamflow shall be addressed by
the integrated management plan pursuant to controls or incentive programs
adopted pursuant to section 46-715;
(b) Prior to January 1, 2026, any new or expanded single commercial
or industrial development served by a nonmunicipal well within an area
-5-

LB344 LB344
2025 2025
determined by the department to be fully appropriated pursuant to section
46-714 or designated as overappropriated pursuant to section 46-713
which, after July 14, 2006, commences water use resulting in the
consumptive use of water in amounts greater than twenty-five million
gallons annually may be subject to controls adopted pursuant to section
46-715. This subdivision does not apply to a water user described in this
subdivision that is regulated by the Industrial Ground Water Regulatory
Act and the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission;
(c) On and after January 1, 2026, the base amount for an annual
allocation to a nonmunicipal commercial or industrial user within an area
determined by the department to be fully appropriated pursuant to section
46-714 or designated as overappropriated pursuant to section 46-713 shall
be the amount specified in subdivision (4)(a) (5)(a) or (b) of this
section;
(d) On and after January 1, 2026, increases in the consumptive use
of water by a nonmunicipal commercial or industrial water user that
result in a decrease in streamflow shall be subject to the controls of an
addressed by the integrated management plan, rule, or order pursuant to
controls or incentive programs adopted pursuant to section 46-715; and
(e) Any reduction in consumptive use associated with new
nonmunicipal industrial or commercial uses of less than twenty-five
million gallons, during the period between July 14, 2006, and January 1,
2026, shall accrue to the benefit of the natural resources district
within which such nonmunicipal industrial or commercial user is located.
Sec. 2. Original section 46-740, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-6-